Colorado, session 2026A, HB1172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Capital construction appropriations for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2022. In Session Laws of Colorado 2022, section
3 of chapter 507, (HB 22-1329), amend Part II (1)(B), Part III (2)(B), and
the affected totals, as the affected totals are amended by section 1 of chapter
473, (SB 23-135), Session Laws of Colorado 2023; as the Part III affected
totals are amended by section 2 of chapter 517, (HB 24-1203), as the Part
II affected totals are amended by section 32 of chapter 257, (HB 24-1465),
and as Part II (1)(B) and Part III (2)(B) are amended by section 82 of
chapter 429, (HB 24-1466), Session Laws of Colorado 2024; as Part III and
the affected totals are further amended by, section 3 of chapter 474, (SB
25-111), and as Part II and Part III are further amended by section 36 of
chapter 301, (SB 25-312), Session Laws of Colorado 2025; and add
footnote 112a as follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

Section 3. Capital Construction Appropriation.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1172

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
PART II
STATE AGENCIES
(1) CAPITAL RENEWAL AND RECAPITALIZATION
(B) Department of Corrections
Utility Water Lines Replacement,
Arkansas Valley Correctional
Facility (Capital Renewal) 9,539,209
Kitchen Renovation, Sterling
Correctional Facility (Capital
Renewal) 2,800,000
Water Tank Repair and
Replacement, East Cañon City
Prison Complex (Capital
Renewal) 5,349,710
5,795,922
Sanitary Sewer Line
Replacement, Buena Vista
Correctional Facility (Capital
Renewal) 2,324,904
1,878,692
Critical Living Unit
Shower/Drain and Toilet Room
Improvements, Arkansas Valley
Correctional Facility (Capital
Renewal) 12,402,937
32,416,760 32,416,760a
a This amount shall be from the Revenue Loss Restoration Cash Fund created in Section 24-75-227 (2)(a), C.R.S. Of this amount, $17,508,230 is of money the state received
from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund and $14,908,530 originates from the General Fund.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1172

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART II
(STATE AGENCIES) $162,668,303 $6,092,930 $156,575,373
PART III
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(2) CAPITAL EXPANSION
(B) Community College of Denver
Boulder Creek Building Remodel
and Addition112a 22,938,122 22,938,122a
30,438,122 30,438,122a
a Of this amount, $21,080,134 shall be from the Revenue Loss Restoration Cash Fund created in Section 24-75-227 (2)(a), C.R.S., and $1,857,988 $9,357,988 shall be from
institutional reserves and donations. The amount from the Revenue Loss Restoration Cash Fund originates from money the state received from the federal Coronavirus State
Fiscal Recovery Fund.
TOTALS PART III
(INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION) 232,162,963 4,870,477 227,292,486
239,662,963 234,792,486
GRAND TOTALS
(CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION) $509,886,336 $10,963,407 $497,157,599a $1,765,330b
$517,386,336 $504,657,599a
a Of this amount, $300,000 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 33-10-111 (4), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1172

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 3.
112a CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION, INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION, CAPITAL EXPANSION, COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF DENVER, BOULDER CREEK BUILDING REMODEL
AND ADDITION -- THIS APPROPRIATION REMAINS AVAILABLE FOR EXPENDITURE UNTIL THE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT OR THE CLOSE OF THE 2026-27 STATE
FISCAL YEAR, WHICHEVER COMES FIRST.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1172

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL CAPITAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL CONSTRUCTION FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
FUND
$ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Capital construction appropriations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 3 of chapter 519, (HB 24-1430),
amend Part III (2)(C) and the affected totals, as Part III (2)(C) and the affected totals are amended by Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of chapter 474, (SB 25-111), as follows:
Section 3. Capital Construction Appropriation.
PART III
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(2) CAPITAL EXPANSION
(C) Colorado Mesa University
Performing Arts Center
Expansion and Renovation AND
ADDITIONAL MAINTENANCE 13,669,574 12,288,947 1,380,627a
14,669,574 2,380,627a
a This amount shall be from institutional reserves and donations.
TOTALS PART III
(INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION) $135,829,950 $112,055,147 $23,774,803
$136,829,950 $24,774,803
GRAND TOTALS
(CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION) $368,474,625 $263,012,259 $103,554,776a $1,907,590b
$369,474,625 $104,554,776a
a Of this amount, $300,000 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 33-10-111 (4), C.R.S.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1172

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1172